Utah statutes.
4-14-4.   Labeling requirement for pesticides specified.

(1) Each container of pesticide distributed in this state shall bear a label setting forth:

(a)  the name, brand, or trademark under which it is distributed;

(b)  an accurate statement of the ingredients on that part of the immediate container (and on the outside container and wrapper of the retail package, if there be one, through which the ingredient statement on the immediate container cannot be clearly read) which is presented or displayed under customary conditions of purchase; provided, that the ingredient statement may appear prominently on another part of the container as permitted pursuant to Section 2(q)(2)(A) of FIFRA if the size or form of the container makes it impracticable to place it on the part of the retail package which is presented or displayed under customary conditions of purchase;

(c)  a warning or caution statement if necessary, which, if complied with together with any requirements imposed under Section 3(d) of FIFRA, is adequate to protect the health and environment;

(d)  the net weight or measure of the content;

(e)  the name and address of the manufacturer, registrant, or person for whom manufactured;

(f)  the EPA registration number assigned to each establishment in which it was produced and the EPA registration number assigned to the pesticide, if required by regulations under FIFRA;

(g)  the federal use classification under which the pesticide is registered or designated for "experimental use only"; and

(h)  directions for use of the pesticide sufficient to effectuate the purposes for which the product is intended and which, if complied with together with any requirements imposed under Section 3(d) of FIFRA, are adequate to protect health and the environment.

(2)  If the pesticide is highly toxic the label shall, in addition to the other label requirements, display:

(a)  the skull and crossbones;

(b)  the word "POISON" in red prominently displayed on a background of distinctly contrasting color; and

(c)  a statement of a practical treatment (first aid or otherwise) in case of poisoning by the pesticide.

